Connecticut, session 2026, HB05566.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 54-56e of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (c) This section shall not be applicable: (1) To any person charged
5 with (A) a class A felony, (B) a class B felony, except a violation of
6 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-122 that does not
7 involve the use, attempted use or threatened use of physical force
8 against another person, or a violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a)
9 of section 53a-122 that does not involve the use, attempted use or
10 threatened use of physical force against another person and does not
11 involve a violation by a person who is a public official, as defined in
12 section 1-110, or a state or municipal employee, as defined in section 1-
13 110, or (C) a violation of section 53a-70b of the general statutes, revision
14 of 1958, revised to January 1, 2019, or section 14-227a or 14-227m,
sHB5566 / File No. 644 1

sHB5566 File No. 644
15 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-227n, subdivision (2)
16 of subsection (a) of section 53-21 or section 53a-56b, 53a-60d, 53a-70, 53a-
17 70a, 53a-71, except as provided in subdivision (5) of this subsection, 53a-
18 72a, 53a-72b, 53a-90a, 53a-196e or 53a-196f, (2) to any person charged
19 with a crime or motor vehicle violation who, as a result of the
20 commission of such crime or motor vehicle violation, causes the death
21 of another person, (3) to any person accused of a family violence crime
22 as defined in section 46b-38a who (A) is eligible for the pretrial family
23 violence education program established under section 46b-38c, or (B)
24 has previously had the pretrial family violence education program
25 invoked in such person's behalf, (4) to any person charged with a
26 violation of section 21a-267, 21a-279 or 21a-279a, who (A) is eligible for
27 the pretrial drug education and community service program established
28 under section 54-56i or the pretrial drug intervention and community
29 service program established under section 54-56q, or (B) has previously
30 had (i) the pretrial drug education program, (ii) the pretrial drug
31 education and community service program established under the
32 provisions of section 54-56i, or (iii) the pretrial drug intervention and
33 community service program established under section 54-56q, invoked
34 on such person's behalf, (5) unless good cause is shown, to (A) any
35 person charged with a class C felony, or (B) any person charged with
36 committing a violation of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 53a-
37 71 while such person was less than four years older than the other
38 person, (6) to any person charged with a violation of section 9-359 or 9-
39 359a, (7) to any person charged with a motor vehicle violation (A) while
40 operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 14-1, or (B)
41 who holds a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit
42 at the time of the violation, (8) to any person charged with a violation of
43 subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of section 53a-60, (9) to a health care
44 provider or vendor participating in the state's Medicaid program
45 charged with a violation of section 53a-122 or subdivision (3) of
46 subsection (a) of section 53a-123, [or] (10) to any person charged with a
47 violation of section 15-132a, 15-133 or 15-140n, or (11) to any person
48 charged with a violation of section 22-329 or 53-247 who has previously
49 participated in the program pursuant to this section, unless fifteen or
sHB5566 / File No. 644 2

sHB5566 File No. 644
50 more years have passed since the date of dismissal by the court of any
51 charge or charges for which the program was invoked on the
52 defendant's behalf.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 54-56e(c)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (c), a reference to the date of dismissal was added for internal
consistency.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5566 / File No. 644 3

sHB5566 File No. 644
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Correction, Dept.; Judicial Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
(Probation) Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill prohibits individuals charged with certain animal cruelty
crimes from participating in the accelerated rehabilitation (AR) program
if they have already participated in the program within the past 15
years, resulting in a minimal potential cost to the Department of
Correction and the Judicial Department for incarceration or probation,
to the extent any individuals who would have been eligible for AR are
no longer eligible because of the bill. On average, the marginal cost to
the state for incarcerating an offender for the year is $3,3001 while the
average marginal cost for supervision in the community is less than
$6002 each year for adults and $450 each year for juveniles.
1 Inmate marginal cost is based on increased consumables (e.g., food, clothing, water,
sewage, living supplies, etc.) This does not include a change in staffing costs or utility
expenses because these expenses would only be realized if a unit or facility opened.
2 Probation marginal cost is based on services provided by private providers and only
includes costs that increase with each additional participant. This does not include a
cost for additional supervision by a probation officer unless a new offense is
anticipated to result in enough additional offenders to require additional probation
officers.
sHB5566 / File No. 644 4

sHB5566 File No. 644
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of individuals who would
have been eligible for AR.
sHB5566 / File No. 644 5

sHB5566 File No. 644
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5566
AN ACT CONCERNING ACCELERATED REHABILITATION IN THE
CASE OF ANIMAL CRUELTY.